Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 7. Shares and Distributions.
§ 13.1-652.
Corporation’s acquisition of its own shares.

A corporation may acquire its own shares, and shares so acquired constitute authorized but unissued shares of the same class, if any, but undesignated as to series.

If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissuance of acquired shares or if the board of directors has authorized the reduction in the number of authorized shares by the number of shares acquired, the number of authorized shares shall be reduced by the number of shares acquired effective when the certificate of amendment is effective. The corporation shall deliver to the Commission for filing articles of amendment that shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The reduction in the number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series;

The total number of authorized shares, itemized by class and series, remaining after reduction of the shares; and

A statement that the reduction in the number of authorized shares was required by the articles of incorporation or was adopted by the board of directors without shareholder approval pursuant to this section, with the date of adoption.

The articles of amendment may be adopted by the board of directors without shareholder action.

If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-65, 13.1-66; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 inserted “if any” following “same class” in subsection A.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote subsection B, which read: “If the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of acquired shares, the number of authorized shares is reduced by the number of shares acquired, effective upon the issuance of a certificate of amendment. The corporation shall file with the Commission articles of amendment setting forth”; in subdivision B 4, substituted “required by the articles of incorporation or was adopted” for “authorized,” and added “with the date of adoption” at the end; redesignated the former second paragraph of subdivision B 4 as subsection C, and redesignated former subsection C as D; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “without shareholder approval pursuant to this section” in subdivision B 4.

§ 13.1-653.
Distributions to shareholders.

The board of directors may authorize and the corporation may make distributions to its shareholders, subject to restriction by the articles of incorporation and the limitation in subsection C.

The board of directors may fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a distribution. If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a distribution, other than one involving a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of the corporation’s shares, the record date is the date the board of directors authorizes the distribution.

No distribution may be made if, after giving it effect:

The corporation would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business; or

The corporation’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus (unless the articles of incorporation permit otherwise) the amount that would be needed, if the corporation were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution of shareholders whose preferential rights are superior to those receiving the distribution.

The board of directors may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection C either on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances. For any public corporation, reliance upon the most recent financial statements that have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States shall be deemed to be reasonable in the circumstances if the financial statements have been audited by independent certified public accountants whose certification does not include a going concern qualification.

Except as provided in subsection G, the effect of a distribution under subsection C is measured:

In the case of a distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of the corporation’s shares, as of the earlier of (i) the date cash or other property is transferred or debt to a shareholder incurred by the corporation or (ii) the date the shareholder ceases to be a shareholder with respect to the acquired shares;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

In all other cases, as of (i) the date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within 120 days after the date of authorization or (ii) the date payment is made if it occurs more than 120 days after the date of authorization.

A corporation’s indebtedness to a shareholder incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the corporation’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

Indebtedness of a corporation, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, is not considered a liability for purposes of determinations under subsection C if its terms provide that payment of principal and interest is made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution to shareholders could then be made under this section. If such indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

This section shall not apply to distributions in liquidation under Article 16 (§

13.1-742

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13-206, 13.1-4, 13.1-43, 13.1-62; 1956, c. 428; 1962, c. 14; 1979, c. 175; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 deleted “of this section” following “in subsection C” in subsection A; substituted “purchase, redemption or other acquisition of the corporation’s” for “repurchase or reacquisition” in subsection B; in subsection D, deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” and added the last sentence; in subsection E, added “Except as provided in subsection G, the effect” and deleted “of this section” following “subsection C” and made a related change; and added subsections G and H.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection B, inserted the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “the record date” for “it”; in subdivision E 1, substituted “cash” for “money,” and inserted “to a shareholder” preceding “incurred”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 41 (2011).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 108.